District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.43

Standards for contracting officer.

(a)

Any contracting manager or contracting officer who performs the cost/benefit analysis required by § 2-301.05b(a)(1) shall meet certain training standards and be certified to ensure a level of management skills and experience in doing cost/benefit analyses.

(b)

Within 60 days of August 14, 1995, the Mayor shall issue, as a part of the District Government Procurement Regulations, rules for all District government employees who participate in the preparation of any cost/benefit analysis for any proposal to contract out services previously provided by District employees. The rules shall include the provisions contained in subsection (a) of this section.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 1102a
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 501(c), 43 DCR 5
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-325.03.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-325.03.
1981 Ed., § 1-1191.4.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 701(c) of the Budget Support Temporary Act of 1995 (D.C. Law 11-78, January 26, 1996, law notification 43 DCR 650).